Washington statutes.
RCW 36.40.210

Monthly report.

On or before the twenty-fifth day of each month the auditor shall submit or make available to the board of county commissioners a report showing the expenditures and liabilities against each separate budget appropriation incurred during the preceding calendar month and like information for the whole of the current fiscal year to the first day of said month, together with the unexpended and unencumbered balance of each appropriation. He or she shall also set forth the receipts from taxes and from sources other than taxation for the same periods.

[ 2009 c 337 s 11; 1963 c 4 s 36.40.210. Prior: 1923 c 164 s 7; RRS s 3997-7.]